Indiana, session 2026, HB1101.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-7-43 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 43. Regional Economic Development Commissions
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "applicable tax credit" has the
meaning set forth in IC 5-28-2-1.5.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to a
regional economic development commission established under
section 9 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "corporation" refers to the
Indiana economic development corporation established by
IC 5-28-3-1.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "development authority"
includes:
(1) the northwest Indiana regional development authority
established by IC 36-7.5-2-1;
(2) a regional development authority established under
2026 IN 1101—LS 6384/DI 125


IC 36-7.6-2-3;
(3) a regional development authority established under
IC 36-7.7-3-1;
(4) the northeast Indiana strategic development commission
established by IC 36-7-39-3; and
(5) any other regional development authority established by
statute.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "economic development region"
refers to an economic development region designated by the
corporation under section 8 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "governing body" refers to:
(1) in the case of the northwest Indiana regional development
authority established by IC 36-7.5-2-1, the development board
appointed under IC 36-7.5-2-3;
(2) in the case of a regional development authority established
under IC 36-7.6-2-3, the development board appointed under
IC 36-7.6-2-7;
(3) in the case of a regional development authority established
under IC 36-7.7-3-1, the strategy committee described in
IC 36-7.7-3-5;
(4) the northeast Indiana strategic development commission
established by IC 36-7-39-3; and
(5) in the case of any other regional development authority
established by statute, the governing body of that regional
development authority.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "primary administrative entity"
refers to the primary administrative entity designated or
established by a commission under section 14 of this chapter for an
economic development region.
Sec. 8. (a) Not later than September 1, 2026, the corporation
shall designate fifteen (15) distinct economic development regions
throughout Indiana, each consisting of one (1) or more counties. A
county may not be divided when establishing an economic
development region.
(b) The corporation shall conduct periodic reviews of the
economic development region boundaries to determine whether the
boundaries of some or all of the economic development regions
should be modified. The corporation may modify the boundaries
of some or all of the economic development regions as determined
necessary by the corporation.
Sec. 9. (a) A regional economic development commission is
established for each economic development region.
2026 IN 1101—LS 6384/DI 125


(b) In an economic development region whose boundaries align
with the boundaries of an existing development authority, the
members of the governing body of the development authority serve
as ex officio members of the commission.
(c) In an economic development region whose boundaries do not
align with the boundaries of an existing development authority, the
members of the commission consist of:
(1) one (1) individual appointed by the county executive of
each county located within the economic development region;
and
(2) one (1) individual appointed by the executive of each city
with a population of at least five thousand (5,000) that is
located within the economic development region.
(d) This subsection applies to members of a commission
appointed under subsection (c). Upon the expiration of the term of
an appointed member of the commission, the member's successor
shall be appointed for a four (4) year term. A member may be
reappointed. If a vacancy occurs among the appointed membership
of the commission, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired
term in the same manner and under the same conditions as the
original appointment.
Sec. 10. (a) Each year, each commission shall elect the following
from among the members of the commission:
(1) A chairperson.
(2) A vice chairperson.
(3) A treasurer.
(b) An individual elected as a chairperson or a vice chairperson:
(1) serves a term of one (1) year beginning July 1 following the
date the individual is elected; and
(2) may be reelected.
Sec. 11. (a) Each commission:
(1) shall fix the time for regular meetings; and
(2) may hold special meetings at the call of the chairperson
with seven (7) days written notice.
(b) A member may waive written notice of a specific meeting by
filing a written notice with the commission.
(c) Written notice is considered to have been given under this
section when the written notice is:
(1) placed in the United States mail, first class postage
prepaid; and
(2) sent to the business addresses of the members of the
commission.
2026 IN 1101—LS 6384/DI 125


Sec. 12. A member of a commission is not entitled to the
minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1. The
member is also not entitled to reimbursement for traveling
expenses and other expenses actually incurred in connection with
the member's duties.
Sec. 13. (a) Each commission shall develop and maintain a
strategic comprehensive economic development plan for the
economic development region that must be approved by the
corporation.
(b) A strategic comprehensive economic development plan must
include at least the following:
(1) Key assets of the region, including institutions of higher
education, key employers, and innovation and colocation
spaces in the region.
(2) Identification of regional industry clusters and growth
areas that are specific to the region.
(3) An analysis of the region's workforce and talent
development, retention, and attraction strategies.
(4) Infrastructure needs of the region.
(5) Key development sites located in the region.
(6) Specific, measurable five (5) year and ten (10) year
objectives, and plans for achieving the objectives, for the
region, including targets for:
(A) per capita income;
(B) population;
(C) employment; and
(D) credential attainment among residents;
in the region.
(c) Each commission shall review and update its strategic
comprehensive economic development plan at least once every five
(5) years, or more often as determined necessary by the
corporation.
Sec. 14. (a) Each commission shall designate, or establish, a
primary administrative entity for the economic development
region that is responsible for:
(1) carrying out the strategic comprehensive economic
development plan for the region;
(2) managing resources in the region; and
(3) coordinating with other local organizations in the region.
(b) The primary administrative entity of a region shall serve as
the primary point of contact in the region for the corporation.
Sec. 15. Each primary administrative entity shall do the
2026 IN 1101—LS 6384/DI 125


following:
(1) Submit the strategic comprehensive economic
development plan to the corporation for approval upon
completion and each time the plan is revised.
(2) Conduct semiannual performance reviews and prepare
reports comparing stated goals and metrics against progress
or completion of the goals or metrics and submit the reports
to the corporation.
(3) Provide timely updates to the corporation concerning
project timelines and the receipt of incentive and grant
requests.
(4) Maintain transparent financial reporting that must be
provided to the corporation upon request.
Sec. 16. The corporation may conduct periodic compliance
reviews and audits of each commission and primary administrative
entity at the discretion of the corporation. The corporation may
have an audit of a commission's or a primary administrative
entity's books and accounts made by a certified public accounting
firm or the state board of accounts. If the audit is to be conducted
by a certified public accounting firm, the firm may not be selected
without a review of the firm's proposal and approval of the firm by
the state board of accounts. The cost of the audit shall be
considered an expense of the commission, and a copy of the audit
shall be made available to the public.
Sec. 17. Each commission shall publish:
(1) after approval by the corporation, the strategic
comprehensive economic development plan for the economic
development region;
(2) key performance data related to the stated goals and
objectives of the strategic comprehensive economic
development plan; and
(3) minutes from each commission meeting;
on a website maintained by the commission.
Sec. 18. (a) Subject to subsection (b), the corporation shall
develop an allocation method for applicable tax credits and other
available state incentives and grants among regions.
(b) When developing the allocation method required under
subsection (a), the corporation shall determine an appropriate
percentage of the total applicable tax credits and state incentives
and grants available in a particular year to reserve for each region
and for the corporation for certain strategies, state initiatives, and
large projects.
2026 IN 1101—LS 6384/DI 125


(c) The corporation shall inform each commission of the
allocation method developed under this section, including any
factors considered as part of determining allocation amounts.
Sec. 19. In addition to applicable tax credits and other state
incentives and grants allocated by a primary administrative entity,
each primary administrative entity shall also disclose to the
corporation any local incentives offered for a particular project.
Sec. 20. The corporation shall provide support to each
commission and primary administrative entity to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.
2026 IN 1101—LS 6384/DI 125